Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-1,110
Arrest of persons found violating act.

Nothing shall be construed to prevent any officer whose duty it is to make arrests from arresting with or without a warrant any person or persons found violating the Nebraska Liquor Control Act.

Laws 1935, c. 116, § 80, p. 416;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 53-380;

R.S.1943, § 53-1,110;

Laws 1994, LB 859, § 17.